OPERATION
  • Refer to Code No. P0201: No. 1 injector system .
  • Refer to Code No. P0202: No. 2 injector system .
  • Refer to Code No. P0203: No. 3 injector system .
  • Refer to Code No. P0204: No. 4 injector system .
FUNCTION
  • If a misfire occurs while the engine is running, the engine speed changes for an instant.
  • The engine-A/T-ECU checks for such changes in engine speed.
TROUBLE JUDGMENT
Check Conditions
  • Engine speed is 500 - 6,500 r/min.
  • Engine coolant temperature is -10°C or higher.
  • Barometric pressure is 76 kPa or higher.
  • Volumetric efficiency is between 30% and 55%.
  • Adaptive learning is complete for the vane which generates a crankshaft position signal.
  • While the engine is running, excluding gear shifting, deceleration, sudden acceleration/deceleration and A/C compressor switching.
  • The throttle deviation is -0.06 V/10 ms to +0.06 V/10 ms.
Judgment Criteria (change in the angular acceleration of the crankshaft is used for misfire detection).
  • Misfire has occurred more frequently than the limit during the last 200 revolutions (when the catalyst temperature has been 950°C or higher).
    or
  • Misfire has occurred 15 times or more in the last 1,000 revolutions (that has been equivalent to approximately 1.5 times the emission standard).
PROBABLE CAUSE
  • Ignition system related part(s) failed
  • Failed crank angle sensor
  • Incorrect air-fuel ratio
  • Low compression pressure
  • Failed engine coolant temperature sensor
  • Skipping of timing belt teeth.
  • EGR system and EGR valve failed
  • Failed engine-A/T-ECU
STEP 2. MUT-II/III data list
  1. Item 21: Engine coolant temperature sensor
  1. Item 81: Long-term fuel compensation
  1. Item 82: Short-term fuel compensation
Q: Are the check results normal?
YES:  Go to Step 3 .
NO:  Perform the diagnosis code classified check procedure for the sensor that has shown an abnormal data valve (Refer to Inspection Chart for Diagnosis Code ).
STEP 3. Check ignition coil spark.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 4
.
NO:  Check ignition circuit system (Refer to Inspection Procedure 31 ).
   
  1. B-01 (No. 1 injector connector)
  1. B-02 (No. 2 injector connector)
  1. B-04 (No. 3 injector connector)
  1. B-05 (No. 4 injector connector)
Q: Are the check results normal?
YES:  Go to Step 5 .
NO:  Repair.
STEP 5. Check injector itself.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 6 .
NO:  Replace injector.
STEP 6. Fuel pressure measurement.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 7 .
NO:  Repair.
©2004 Mitsubishi Motors Corporation